Washington statutes.
RCW 7.43.070

Service of complaint.

A copy of the complaint, together with a notice of the time and place of the hearing of the action shall be served upon the defendant at least one business day before the hearing. Service may also be made by posting the papers in the same manner as is provided for in RCW 7.43.030. If the hearing is then continued at the request of any defendant, all temporary orders and injunctions shall be extended as a matter of course.

[ 1988 c 141 s 10.]